Florida, session 2026, SB1590.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âSafe Students and 23 Survivors Act.â 24 Section 2.âParagraph (o) is added to subsection (4) of 25 section 1001.42, Florida Statutes, to read: 26 1001.42âPowers and duties of district school board.âThe 27 district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all 28 powers and perform all duties listed below: 29 (4)âESTABLISHMENT, ORGANIZATION, AND OPERATION OF SCHOOLS. 30 Adopt and provide for the execution of plans for the 31 establishment, organization, and operation of the schools of the 32 district, including, but not limited to, the following: 33 (o)âSexual assault response liaison.âAppoint a districtwide 34 sexual assault response liaison who shall connect students with 35 law enforcement, counseling, and advocacy services in response 36 to a sexual assault. The Department of Health shall, for such 37 liaisons, administer training and materials based on 38 recommendations and training guidelines provided by the Florida 39 Council Against Sexual Violence. 40 Section 3.âSection 1003.08, Florida Statutes, is created to 41 read: 42 1003.08âSafe Students and Survivors Grant Program.â 43 (1)âSubject to legislative funding, there is established 44 the Safe Students and Survivors Grant Program to be administered 45 by the Department of Education. The program shall provide grants 46 to school districts to partner with local nonprofit 47 organizations and advocacy centers to provide student workshops 48 and instructional personnel training on the prevention of sexual 49 assaults and sexual assault survivor support programs. 50 (2)âThe department shall: 51 (a)âCreate an application and award criteria. 52 (b)âEstablish reporting requirements for school districts 53 and any school that receives public funding in vouchers which 54 apply for this grant. 55 (c)âAnnually provide a report to the President of the 56 Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives on the 57 program. 58 (3)âSchool districts, charter schools, and private schools 59 shall provide a report to the department, in a format prescribed 60 by the department based upon privacy laws and standards, on the 61 use of a grant award. 62 (4)âThe State Board of Education may adopt rules to 63 administer this section. 64 Section 4.âParagraph (o) of subsection (2) of section 65 1003.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 66 1003.42âRequired instruction.â 67 (2)âMembers of the instructional staff of the public 68 schools, subject to the rules of the State Board of Education 69 and the district school board, shall teach efficiently and 70 faithfully, using the books and materials required that meet the 71 highest standards for professionalism and historical accuracy, 72 following the prescribed courses of study, and employing 73 approved methods of instruction, the following: 74 (o)âComprehensive age-appropriate and developmentally 75 appropriate K-12 instruction on: 76 1.âHealth education that addresses concepts of community 77 health, consumer health, environmental health, and family life, 78 including: 79 a.âInjury prevention and safety;. 80 b.âInternet safety;. 81 c.âNutrition;. 82 d.âPersonal health;. 83 e.âPrevention and control of disease;. 84 f.âSubstance use and abuse; and. 85 g.âPrevention of child sexual abuse, exploitation, and 86 human trafficking. 87 2.âFor students in grades 7 through 12, teen dating 88 violence and abuse, sexual assault prevention, and consent. This 89 component must include, but not be limited to, all of the 90 following: 91 a.âThe definitions definition of dating violence and abuse 92 and sexual assault, including recognizing abusive behavior., 93 b.âThe warning signs of dating violence, and abusive 94 behavior, and sexual assault., 95 c.âThe characteristics of healthy relationships., 96 d.âMeasures to prevent and stop dating violence and abuse., 97 and 98 e.âCommunity resources available to victims of dating 99 violence, and abuse, and sexual assault. 100 f.âUnderstanding consent. 101 g.âBystander intervention of sexual assault. 102 h.âHow to safely report a sexual assault. 103 3.âFor students in grades 6 through 12, awareness of the 104 benefits of sexual abstinence as the expected standard and the 105 consequences of teenage pregnancy. 106 4.âLife skills that build confidence, support mental and 107 emotional health, and enable students to overcome challenges, 108 including: 109 a.âSelf-awareness and self-management;. 110 b.âResponsible decisionmaking;. 111 c.âResiliency;. 112 d.âRelationship skills and conflict resolution;. 113 e.âUnderstanding and respecting other viewpoints and 114 backgrounds; and. 115 f.âFor grades 9 through 12, developing leadership skills, 116 interpersonal skills, organization skills, and research skills; 117 creating a rÃ©sumÃ©, including a digital rÃ©sumÃ©; exploring career 118 pathways; using state career planning resources; developing and 119 practicing the skills necessary for employment interviews; 120 workplace ethics and workplace law; managing stress and 121 expectations; and self-motivation. 122 5.a.âFor students in grades 6 through 12, the social, 123 emotional, and physical effects of social media. This component 124 must include, but need not be limited to, the negative effects 125 of social media on mental health, including addiction; the 126 distribution of misinformation on social media; how social media 127 manipulates behavior; the permanency of sharing materials 128 online; how to maintain personal security and identify 129 cyberbullying, predatory behavior, and human trafficking on the 130 Internet; and how to report suspicious behavior encountered on 131 the Internet. 132 b.âThe Department of Education shall make available online 133 the instructional material being used pursuant to this 134 subparagraph, and each district school board shall notify 135 parents of its availability. 136 137 Health education and life skills instruction and materials may 138 not contradict the principles enumerated in subsection (3). 139 140 The State Board of Education is encouraged to adopt standards 141 and pursue assessment of the requirements of this subsection. 142 Instructional programming that incorporates the values of the 143 recipients of the Congressional Medal of Honor and that is 144 offered as part of a social studies, English Language Arts, or 145 other schoolwide character building and veteran awareness 146 initiative meets the requirements of paragraph (u). 147 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.